Maine, session 132, LD2191.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 29-A MRSA §1751, sub-§1-A is enacted to read:
1-A. Biennial inspection; rental vehicles. A business that rents noncommercial
motor vehicles to the public may receive a 2-year certificate of inspection for each vehicle
if the business:
A. Has at least 700 noncommercial motor vehicles registered in the State per year; and
B. Files an affidavit with the Department of Public Safety, Bureau of State Police that
includes a statement that the fleet of rental vehicles under paragraph A will meet or
exceed the inspection standards set forth in section 1756 and administered by the Chief
of the State Police over the 2-year period.
Sec. 2. 29-A MRSA §1766, sub-§3, as amended by PL 2011, c. 191, §2, is further
amended to read:
3. Fee. Except as provided in subsection 3‑A and 3-B, stickers are furnished by the
Chief of the State Police at $2.50 each.
Sec. 3. 29-A MRSA §1766, sub-§3-B is enacted to read:
3-B. Fee for business that rents noncommercial motor vehicles. Stickers furnished
by the Chief of the State Police to a business that rents noncommercial vehicles pursuant
to section 1751, subsection 1-A are 2 times the fee for stickers under subsection 3.
Sec. 4. Effective date. This Act takes effect January 1, 2027.
Page 1 - 132LR3029(03)